Utah statutes.
58-60-112.   Reporting of unprofessional or unlawful conduct -- Immunity
from liability.
(1)  Upon learning of an act of unlawful or unprofessional conduct as defined
in Section 58-60-102 by a person licensed under this chapter or an individual
not licensed under this chapter and engaged in acts or practices regulated
under this chapter, that results in disciplinary action by a licensed health
care facility, professional practice group, or professional society, or that
results in a significant adverse impact upon the public health, safety, or
welfare, the following shall report the conduct in writing to the division
within ten days after learning of the disciplinary action or the conduct
unless the individual or person knows it has been reported:
(a)  a licensed health care facility or organization in which an individual
licensed under this chapter engages in practice;
(b)  an individual licensed under this chapter; and
(c)  a professional society or organization whose membership is individuals
licensed under this chapter and which has the authority to discipline or expel
a member for acts of unprofessional or unlawful conduct.
(2)  Any individual reporting acts of unprofessional or unlawful conduct by an
individual licensed under this chapter is immune from liability arising out of
the disclosure to the extent the individual furnishes the information in good
faith and without malice.
